Massachusetts, session 194th, H1454.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1 
Section 15E of Chapter 15A of the general laws as so appearing is hereby amended by 
inserting the following sentence at the end of the second paragraph: “Provided, a community 
college shall be eligible to receive said match for any donations received by its foundation, 
regardless of whether said funds are endowed or contributed to a capital outlay program.” 
SECTION 2 
Said section 15A is further amended by striking out the word “Private” in the third 
paragraph, and inserting in place thereof the following words: “Except for the community 
colleges, private” 
SECTION 3 
This act shall take effect immediately upon passage.